trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
    <pardef n="and/i__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ans</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anum</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnar</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnir</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stavur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gudur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="skelkur"><i>skelkur</i><par n="stavur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samveldisdómstólur"><i>samveldisdómstólur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soðspónur"><i>soðspónur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ormaungi"><i>ormaung</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gravarbakki"><i>gravarbakk</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bíðilisti"><i>bíðilist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evnislisti"><i>evnislist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stólur"><i>stólur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eginpeningur"><i>eginpeningur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knívur"><i>knívur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="persónsskaði"><i>persónsskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tindur"><i>tindur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="partur"><i>partur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tetningslisti"><i>tetningslist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fólkanavnalisti"><i>fólkanavnalist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskur"><i>fiskur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarðfrøðingur"><i>jarðfrøðingur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prestur"><i>prestur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framsýnari"><i>framsýnar</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuglafjarðaprestur"><i>fuglafjarðaprestur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høvundur"><i>høvundur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skipalisti"><i>skipalist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="køkur"><i>køkur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gjaldslisti"><i>gjaldslist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stavur"><i>stavur</i><par n="stavur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="løgfrøðingur"><i>løgfrøðingur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stálskaði"><i>stálskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landsverkfrøðingur"><i>landsverkfrøðingur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bilur"><i>bilur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diagnosulisti"><i>diagnosulist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sveinur"><i>sveinur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horuungi"><i>horuung</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dómstólur"><i>dómstólur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nakkaskaði"><i>nakkaskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heilaskaði"><i>heilaskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeiðslisti"><i>arbeiðslist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tryggingarskaði"><i>tryggingarskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mannarættindadómstólur"><i>mannarættindadómstólur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="partapeningur"><i>partapeningur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peningur"><i>peningur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tættleikalisti"><i>tættleikalist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kongur"><i>kongur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svartalisti"><i>svartalist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lóggávuspurningur"><i>lóggávuspurningur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altjóðadómstólur"><i>altjóðadómstólur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lærlingur"><i>lærlingur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ynskilisti"><i>ynskilist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ferðsluskaði"><i>ferðsluskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ársungi"><i>ársung</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rognakalvi"><i>rognakalv</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ungi"><i>ung</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bátur"><i>bátur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uttanflokkalisti"><i>uttanflokkalist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fólkaflokslisti"><i>fólkaflokslist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dreymur"><i>dreymur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hundur"><i>hundur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yvirlitslisti"><i>yvirlitslist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="næmingur"><i>næmingur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gudur"><i>gudur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leikari"><i>leikar</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ringur"><i>ringur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fleirmálaorðalisti"><i>fleirmálaorðalist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leypur"><i>leypur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borgaralisti"><i>borgaralist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brandlisti"><i>brandlist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amboðspeningur"><i>amboðspeningur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fosturskaði"><i>fosturskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuglur"><i>fuglur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="músaskaði"><i>músaskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karmlisti"><i>karmlist</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umhvørvisskaði"><i>umhvørvisskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koppsetingarskaði"><i>koppsetingarskað</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="profetur"><i>profetur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="munnur"><i>munnur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dunnuungi"><i>dunnuung</i><par n="and/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="íslendingur"><i>íslendingur</i><par n="gudur__n"/></e>
